Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3 FEES AND CASH FUNDS
42-3-310. Additional registration fees - apportionment of fees.

Every owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that is primarily designed to be operated or drawn upon a highway, except the vehicles specifically exempted from payment of registration fees by this article, shall, within the registration period prescribed by law or within ten days after the date of purchase of any such vehicle, pay an annual registration fee of one dollar and fifty cents, which annual fee shall be in addition to the annual registration fee prescribed by law for such vehicle.

The additional registration fee provided for in this section shall not be transmitted to the department, but the aggregate amount of all such fees paid over by the authorized agent to the county treasurer shall be retained by the treasurer and allocated by the treasurer to the county and to the cities and incorporated towns located within the boundaries of the county on the basis of the record of rural and urban registrations that indicates the place of residence of each vehicle owner paying registration fees.

The owner of a vehicle specified in subsection (1) of this section who is required to pay an annual registration fee for such vehicle to the department shall also pay the additional annual registration fee provided for in this section to the department, and the department shall transmit such additional fee to the proper county treasurer, as indicated by the place of residence of such owner, and such county treasurer shall allocate such fee in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

Two dollars and fifty cents of each annual vehicle registration fee imposed by sections 42-3-304 to 42-3-306, exclusive of the annual registration fees prescribed for motorcycles, trailer coaches, special mobile machinery, and trailers having an empty weight of two thousand pounds or less and exclusive of a registration fee paid for a fractional part of a year, shall not be transmitted to the department but shall be paid over by the authorized agent, as collected, to the county treasurer, who shall credit the same to an account entitled "apportioned vehicle registration fees". On the tenth day of each month, the county treasurer shall apportion the balance in the account existing on the last day of the immediately preceding month between the county and the cities and incorporated towns located within the boundaries of the county on the basis of the record of rural and urban registrations that indicates the place of residence of each vehicle owner.

All amounts allocated to the county shall be credited to the county road and bridge fund, and all amounts allocated to a city or incorporated town shall be credited to an appropriate fund and expended by such city or incorporated town only for the construction and maintenance of highways, roads, and streets located within its boundaries.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1170, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1269, § 33, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(4) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1492, § 14, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-139 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-311. Low-power scooter registration - fee.

Every low-power scooter sold in this state shall have an identification number stamped on its frame, which number shall be recorded upon registration. A low-power scooter shall be registered with the department, which registration shall be evidenced by a number decal that is securely affixed to the low-power scooter frame in a conspicuous place. Registration shall be valid for a period of three years, and the fee for such registration shall be five dollars. Retail sellers of low-power scooters shall retain one dollar from each such fee, and four dollars of each such fee shall be forwarded monthly to the department for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the highway users tax fund.

The general assembly shall make appropriations from the fund for the expenses of the administration of this section, and any fees credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in excess of the amount of the appropriations shall be allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(f), C.R.S. The department shall promulgate rules authorizing retail sellers of low-power scooters to be agents of the department for such registration.

Source:

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 148, § 24, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1171, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1269, § 34, effective October 1.

42-3-312. Special license plate surcharge.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this article 3, an applicant for a special license plate created by rule in accordance with section 42-3-207, as the section existed when the plate was created, or license plates issued pursuant to sections 42-3-211 to 42-3-214, sections 42-3-217 to 42-3-218, sections 42-3-221 to 42-3-234, and sections 42-3-237 to 42-3-254 shall pay an issuance fee of twenty-five dollars; except that the fee is not imposed on special license plates exempted from additional fees for the issuance of a military special license plate by section 42-3-213 (1)(b)(II). The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1574, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 2, effective August 5; entire section amended, p. 996, § 2, effective August 5; entire section amended, p. 2273, § 4, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1347), ch. 357, p. 1861, § 2, effective August 5; entire section amended, (HB 09-1100), ch. 279, p. 1247, § 2, effective August 5; entire section amended, (SB 09-161), ch. 412, p. 2282, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-103), ch. 304, p. 1438, § 2, effective August 11; entire section amended, (HB 10-1214), ch. 394, p. 1873, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-197), ch. 291, p. 1356, § 2, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 11-1166), ch. 276, p. 1242, § 2, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 11-1298), ch. 251, p. 1091, § 2, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 11-1316), ch. 192, p. 739, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1295), ch. 89, p. 291, § 2, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 12-1023), ch. 134, p. 461, § 2, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 12-1131), ch. 146, p. 527, § 2, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 12-1302), ch. 215, p. 927, § 2, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 12-1275), ch. 194, p. 775, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-224), ch. 245, p. 1185, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-036), ch. 334, p. 1487, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-229), ch. 293, p. 1196, § 2, effective August 5; entire section amended, (HB 15-1313), ch. 243, p. 900, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1012), ch. 142, p. 473, § 2, effective April 18; entire section amended, (HB 17-1212), ch. 378, p. 1948, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1255), ch. 226, p. 1436, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended (SB 19-167), ch. 221, p. 2249, § 2, effective August 2; entire section amended (HB 19-1255), ch. 348, p. 3236, § 2, effective August 2.

42-3-313. Fee for long-term or permanent registration - trailers and semitrailers.

In lieu of any other fee imposed for registration, the fee for registration issued under section 42-3-102 (4) is twenty-four dollars and fifty cents.

The department or authorized agent who registered the commercial trailer or semitrailer may retain two dollars of the registration fee.

The department or authorized agent shall retain one dollar and fifty cents of the fee, which the department shall transfer to the county, if applicable, and the county shall allocate to the county road and bridge fund.

The department shall transfer the remainder of the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the following amounts to the following funds:

Fifty cents to the Colorado state titling and registration account created in section 42-1-211 (2) within the highway users tax fund until July 1, 2019, and thereafter to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211 (2) within the highway users tax fund;

Two dollars and fifty cents to the license plate cash fund created in section 42-3-301 (1)(b);

Five dollars to the statewide bridge enterprise special revenue fund created in section 43-4-805 (3)(a), C.R.S.; and

The remainder of the fee to the highway users tax fund.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1038), ch. 276, p. 1457, § 6, effective June 8.

L. 2017:

(2)(c)(I) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 371, § 19, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2)(c)(I) amended, (SB 18-253), ch. 293, p. 1800, § 5, effective May 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

42-3-314. Military deployment.

Motor vehicle fees exempted. If the owner is a member of the United States armed forces and has orders to serve outside the United States, the owner may exempt the Class C personal property or Class B personal property under sixteen thousand pounds empty weight from the registration fees imposed under this part 3 during the time the owner is serving. If the owner serves less than one year outside the United States, the fees are exempt for the portion of the year that the owner served outside the United States, prorated according to the number of months the owner was in the United States.

Qualifications. In order for a motor vehicle to qualify for the exemption from registration fees under this section, the owner must:

Show the department military orders to serve outside the United States or any evidence acceptable to the department that the owner served outside the United States; and

File a signed affidavit that the motor vehicle will not be operated on a highway during the exemption period.

If a person has already paid the normal fees under this part 3 for a motor vehicle that is eligible for an exemption under this section, the department shall credit the person the exempted portion of the fee amount towards the person's fees for succeeding years.

Violations. A person shall not operate the motor vehicle during the time covered by the affidavit filed under subsection (2) of this section. A violation of this section is a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-075), ch. 264, p. 1060, § 2, effective August 6.